Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-526
Effect of reinstatement of series limited liability company or revocation of voluntary dissolution.

If a series limited liability company that has been administratively dissolved is reinstated, or a series limited liability company that voluntarily dissolved rescinds its dissolution:

(1) each protected series of the company ceases winding up; and

(2) section 21-152 applies to each protected series of the company in accordance with section 21-508.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 27;

Laws 2019, LB78, § 14.